Connecticut, session 2026, HB05495.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 5-169 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) [No reconsideration of] (1) Prior to making a decision concerning
a member's eligibility for a disability retirement allowance or the
discontinuance of such allowance, [shall be made by the board unless a
member, upon application to the board for a redetermination, discloses
additional facts concerning his condition at the date of termination of
employment] the board shall hold a hearing. After the hearing, the
board shall send the member a written copy of the board's decision
containing a statement of the reasons for such decision. Any member
aggrieved by the decision of the board may appeal the decision to the
Superior Court in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall take effect until the State
Employees' Bargaining Agent Coalition has provided its written
consent to the clerks of both houses of the General Assembly to
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5495
incorporate the terms of this subsection into its collective bargaining
agreement.
Sec. 2. Subsection (g) of section 5-192p of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(g) [No reconsideration of] (1) Prior to making a decision concerning
a member's eligibility for a disability retirement allowance or the prior
discontinuance of such allowance, [shall be made by the board unless a
member, upon application to the board for a redetermination, discloses
additional facts concerning his condition at the date of termination of
employment or at the time of discontinuance as appropriate] the board
shall hold a hearing. After the hearing, the board shall send the member
a written copy of the board's decision containing a statement of the
reasons for such decision. Any member aggrieved by the decision of the
board may appeal the decision to the Superior Court in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 54.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall take effect until the State
Employees' Bargaining Agent Coalition has provided its written
consent to the clerks of both houses of the General Assembly to
incorporate the terms of this subsection into its collective bargaining
agreement.
Sec. 3. Section 4-183 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) A person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available
within the agency and who is aggrieved by a final decision may appeal
to the Superior Court as provided in this section. The filing of a petition
for reconsideration is not a prerequisite to the filing of such an appeal.
(b) A person may appeal a preliminary, procedural or intermediate
agency action or ruling to the Superior Court if (1) it appears likely that
the person will otherwise qualify under this chapter to appeal from the
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5495
final agency action or ruling and (2) postponement of the appeal would
result in an inadequate remedy.
(c) (1) Within forty-five days after mailing of the final decision under
section 4-180 or, if there is no mailing, within forty-five days after
personal delivery of the final decision under said section, or (2) within
forty-five days after the agency denies a petition for reconsideration of
the final decision pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section
4-181a, or (3) within forty-five days after mailing of the final decision
made after reconsideration pursuant to subdivisions (3) and (4) of
subsection (a) of section 4-181a or, if there is no mailing, within forty-
five days after personal delivery of the final decision made after
reconsideration pursuant to said subdivisions, or (4) within forty-five
days after the expiration of the ninety-day period required under
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 4-181a if the agency decides
to reconsider the final decision and fails to render a decision made after
reconsideration within such period, whichever is applicable and is later,
a person appealing as provided in this section shall serve a copy of the
appeal on the agency that rendered the final decision at its office or at
the office of the Attorney General in Hartford and file the appeal with
the clerk of the superior court for the judicial district of New Britain or
for the judicial district wherein the person appealing resides or, if that
person is not a resident of this state, with the clerk of the court for the
judicial district of New Britain. Within that time, the person appealing
shall also serve a copy of the appeal on each party listed in the final
decision at the address shown in the decision, provided failure to make
such service within forty-five days on parties other than the agency that
rendered the final decision shall not deprive the court of jurisdiction
over the appeal. Service of the appeal shall be made by a state marshal
making service in the same manner as complaints are served in ordinary
civil actions.
(d) The person appealing, not later than fifteen days after filing the
appeal, shall file or cause to be filed with the clerk of the court an
affidavit, or the state marshal's return, stating the date and manner in
which a copy of the appeal was served on each party and on the agency
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5495
that rendered the final decision, and, if service was not made on a party,
the reason for failure to make service. If the failure to make service
causes prejudice to any party to the appeal or to the agency, the court,
after hearing, may dismiss the appeal.
(e) If service has not been made on a party, the court, on motion, shall
make such orders of notice of the appeal as are reasonably calculated to
notify each party not yet served.
(f) The filing of an appeal shall not, of itself, stay enforcement of an
agency decision. An application for a stay may be made to the agency,
to the court or to both. Filing of an application with the agency shall not
preclude action by the court. A stay, if granted, shall be on appropriate
terms.
(g) Within thirty days after the service of the appeal, or within such
further time as may be allowed by the court, the agency shall transcribe
any portion of the record that has not been transcribed and transmit to
the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the entire record
of the proceeding appealed from, which shall include the agency's
findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated. By stipulation
100 of all parties to such appeal proceedings, the record may be shortened.
101 A party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to limit the record may be
102 taxed by the court for the additional costs. The court may require or
103 permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.
104 (h) If, before the date set for hearing on the merits of an appeal,
105 application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence,
106 and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional
107 evidence is material and that there were good reasons for failure to
108 present it in the proceeding before the agency, the court may order that
109 the additional evidence be taken before the agency upon conditions
110 determined by the court. The agency may modify its findings and
111 decision by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence
112 and any modifications, new findings, or decisions with the reviewing
113 court.
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5495
114 (i) The appeal shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall
115 be confined to the record. If alleged irregularities in procedure before
116 the agency are not shown in the record or if facts necessary to establish
117 aggrievement are not shown in the record, proof limited thereto may be
118 taken in the court. The court, upon request, shall hear oral argument and
119 receive written briefs.
120 (j) [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection (n) of this section,
121 the court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the agency as to the
122 weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court shall affirm the
123 decision of the agency unless the court finds that substantial rights of
124 the person appealing have been prejudiced because the administrative
125 findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are: (1) In violation of
126 constitutional or statutory provisions; (2) in excess of the statutory
127 authority of the agency; (3) made upon unlawful procedure; (4) affected
128 by other error of law; (5) clearly erroneous in view of the reliable,
129 probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or (6) arbitrary
130 or capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly
131 unwarranted exercise of discretion. If the court finds such prejudice, it
132 shall sustain the appeal and, if appropriate, may render a judgment
133 under subsection (k) of this section or remand the case for further
134 proceedings. For purposes of this section, a remand is a final judgment.
135 (k) If a particular agency action is required by law, the court, on
136 sustaining the appeal, may render a judgment that modifies the agency
137 decision, orders the particular agency action, or orders the agency to
138 take such action as may be necessary to effect the particular action.
139 (l) In all appeals taken under this section, costs may be taxed in favor
140 of the prevailing party in the same manner, and to the same extent, that
141 costs are allowed in judgments rendered by the Superior Court. No costs
142 shall be taxed against the state, except as provided in section 4-184a.
143 (m) In any case in which a person appealing claims that he cannot
144 pay the costs of an appeal under this section, he shall, within the time
145 permitted for filing the appeal, file with the clerk of the court to which
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5495
146 the appeal is to be taken an application for waiver of payment of such
147 fees, costs and necessary expenses, including the requirements of bond,
148 if any. The application shall conform to the requirements prescribed by
149 rule of the judges of the Superior Court. After such hearing as the court
150 determines is necessary, the court shall render its judgment on the
151 application, which judgment shall contain a statement of the facts the
152 court has found, with its conclusions thereon. The filing of the
153 application for the waiver shall toll the time limits for the filing of an
154 appeal until such time as a judgment on such application is rendered.
155 (n) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (j) of this section,
156 any review of a decision of the Connecticut State Employees Retirement
157 Commission shall be de novo.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 5-169(d)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 5-192p(g)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 4-183
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6